Indiana, session 2026, HB1141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-14-1-14.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) A person who
recklessly violates IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a
committee with the personal funds of an officer, a member, or an
associate of the committee commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates
IC 3-9-2-9(c) by commingling the funds of a committee with the
personal funds of an officer, a member, or an associate of the
committee commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in subsection (b) is a Level 6 felony if
a person commingles at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) of
committee funds with the personal funds of an officer, a member,
or an associate of the committee.
2026 IN 1141—LS 6765/DI 144